Utah statutes.
51-4-1.   Deposits by state officers, boards, commissions, institutions, departments, divisions, agencies, and similar instrumentalities.

(1)  As used in this section, "agency" means each officer, board, commission, institution, department, division, agency, and other similar instrumentality of the state of Utah.

(2)  Unless an agency receives a written variance from the state treasurer, each agency shall deposit daily, if practicable, but no later than once every three banking days, all collections of state money and other public funds with:

(a)  the state treasurer; or

(b)  a qualified depository for the credit of the state.

(3)  The state treasurer may make policies governing the reporting and remitting to him of these funds.



Amended by Chapter 115, 2004 General Session

